Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1076.
do enact as follows:AB1076,11Section 1. 20.370 (1) (hy) of the statutes is created to read:AB1076,2,5220.370 (1) (hy) Sharp-tailed grouse hunting fees. Seven dollars from each 3sharp-tailed grouse hunting permit processing fee collected under s. 29.563 (14) (a) 43. to be used for administering sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits and for sharp-5tailed grouse management and research activities.AB1076,26Section 2. 29.192 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1076,2,20729.192 (4) (a) If the department decides to limit the number of persons taking 8Canada geese or sharp-tailed grouse by issuing permits and if the number of 9persons seeking the permits exceeds the number of available permits, the 10department shall issue the permits according to a cumulative preference system 11established by the department. The department shall give a preference point to 12each applicant for each previous season for which the applicant applied but was not 13issued a permit. The system shall establish preference categories for these 14applicants, with higher priority given to those categories with more points than 15those with fewer points. Applicants who fail to apply at least once during any 3 16consecutive years shall lose all previously accumulated preference points. If the 17number of applicants within a preference category or subcategory exceeds the 18number of permits available in the category or subcategory, the department shall 19select at random within the category or subcategory the applicants to be issued the 20permits.AB1076,31Section 3. 29.192 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB1076,3,5229.192 (7) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), if the department issues sharp-3tailed grouse hunting permits, the department shall issue a resident or nonresident 4sharp-tailed grouse hunting permit to any person who applies for such a permit and 5who pays the fees required for the permit.AB1076,3,106(b) In issuing resident sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits and nonresident 7sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits under this subsection, the department shall 8determine the number of permits it will issue in a given sharp-tailed grouse 9hunting season and shall allocate the permits to residents and nonresidents in the 10following manner:AB1076,3,17111. If the number of applicants for resident sharp-tailed grouse hunting 12permits exceeds the number of resident sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits that 13are available, the department shall select at random the residents to be issued the 14permits. If the number of applicants for resident sharp-tailed grouse hunting 15permits is less than the number of resident sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits 16that are available, the department shall reallocate the unissued permits to be 17issued as nonresident sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits under subd. 2.AB1076,3,24182. If the number of applicants for nonresident sharp-tailed grouse hunting 19permits exceeds the number of nonresident sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits 20that are available, the department shall select at random the nonresidents to be 21issued the permits. If the number of applicants for nonresident sharp-tailed grouse 22hunting permits is less than the number of nonresident sharp-tailed grouse 23hunting permits that are available, the department shall reallocate the unissued 24permits to be issued as resident sharp-tailed grouse hunting permits.AB1076,41Section 4. 29.563 (14) (a) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1076,4,6229.563 (14) (a) 1. The processing fee for applications for approvals under the 3cumulative preference systems for the hunter’s choice deer hunting permit, bonus 4deer hunting permit, wild turkey hunting license, Canada goose hunting permit, 5sharp-tailed grouse hunting permit, otter trapping permit, fisher trapping permit 6or sturgeon fishing permit: $2.75.AB1076,57Section 5. 29.563 (14) (a) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1076,4,9829.563 (14) (a) 3. The processing fee for applications for sharp-tailed grouse 9hunting permits, elk hunting licenses, and wolf harvesting licenses: $9.75.AB1076,610Section 6. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 11publication, except as follows:AB1076,4,1312(1) The treatment of s. 29.192 (4) (a) and (7) takes effect on the first day of the 1360th month beginning after publication.AB1076,4,1414